apertium-tuk.tuk.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>       ! Имя существительное · Noun
%<adj%>     !
%<np%>      !
%<abbr%>    !
%<adv%>     !
%<vaux%>     !
%<num%>     !
%<ij%>      !
%<det%>     !
%<prn%>     !
%<post%>    ! Послелог · Postposition
%<postadv%> !
%<cnjcoo%>  !
%<cnjsub%>  !
%<pred%>    !
%<cop%>     !
%<mod%>     !
%<v%>       !
%<qst%>     !

%<subst%>   !
%<attr%>    !
%<advl%>    !
 
%<tv%>      !
%<iv%>      !

%<pers%>    !
%<dem%>     !
%<ord%>     !
%<ref%>     !
%<itg%>     !
%<qnt%>     !
%<neg%>     !
%<ind%>     !

%<ant%>     !
%<top%>     !
%<al%>     !

%<gna_perf%>    ! Verbal adverb: -{U}p
 
%<prc_perf%>    ! Participle:    -{U}p
%<gpr_rsub%>    ! Participle:    -ý{Ä}n      =   Present participle
%<gpr_past%>    ! Participle:    -{A}n       =   Past participle 
%<gpr_fut%>    ! Participle:    -j{A}k      =   Future participle

%<ger%>    ! Gerund:        -m{A}       =   Process noun
%<ger_inf%>    ! Gerund:        -m{A}g      =   Indefinite "infinitive"
%<ger_past%>    ! Gerund:        -{A}n       =   Past gerund
%<ger_abst%>    ! Gerund:        -{y}ş       =   Continuous "infinitive" (fact/manner)
%<ger_impf%>    ! Gerund:        -ý{Ä}n      = 
%<ger_fut%>    ! Gerund:        -j{A}g      =   Future gerund

%<pass%>    !
%<caus%>    !
%<nec%>   !

%<pres%>    ! Finite:        -ý{Ä}n      =   Short form of present
%<perf%>    ! Finite:         
%<ifi%>    ! Finite:        -d{Y}       =
%<evid%>    ! Finite:        -{y}pd{Y}r  =   Subjective (evidential) past indefinite
%<prog%>    ! Finite:        -{y}{Ä}r
%<aor%>     ! Finite:        -{A}r
%<cond%>    ! Finite:        -s{A} 
%<imp%>     !
%<fut%>     ! Finite:        -j{A}g

%<p1%>      !
%<p2%>      !
%<p3%>      !
%<frm%>     !

%<px1sg%>   !
%<px2sg%>   !
%<px3sp%>   !
%<px1pl%>   !
%<px2pl%>   !

%<f%>       !
%<m%>       !

%<sg%>      !
%<pl%>      !

%<nom%>     !
%<acc%>     !
%<gen%>     !
%<dat%>     !
%<loc%>     !
%<abl%>     !
%<abe%>     !

%<sent%>      ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>      ! Hyphen
%<cm%>        ! Comma
%<apos%>      ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>     ! Quote marker (right hand side) 
%<lquot%>     ! Quote marker (left hand side) 
%<rpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side) 
%<lpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side) 


           ! Back | Front
%{A%}      ! a    | e 
%{Y%}      ! y    | i
%{Ä%}      ! a    | ä
%{U%}      ! y    | i     | u   | ü
           ! -------------------
           ! -------------------
%{l%}      ! l    | n  
%{n%}      ! n    | -
%{a%}      ! a    | e  | - 
%{ä%}      ! a    | e  | ä 
%{s%}      ! s    | -
%{u%}      ! 0 |  y | i  |u | ü  
%{y%}      ! {U}  | -
%{d%}      ! d    | -  [only caus]
%{r%}      ! r    | -  [only caus]

%{Ø%}      ! Block devoicing
%>
% 

LEXICON Root

Modals ; 
Conjunctions ; 
Postpositions ; 
Postadverbs ; 
Determiners ; 
Pronouns ; 
Numerals ; 
Nouns ; 
ProperNouns ; 
Adjectives ; 
Adverbs ; 
Verbs ; 
Interjections ; 
Abbreviations ; 
Punctuation ; 

LEXICON CLIT 

%+mi%<qst%>:%>m%{Y%} # ;
%+hem%<cnjcoo%>:%>%{A%}m # ;
%+da%<cnjcoo%>:%>d%{A%} # ;
# ; 

LEXICON CLIT-COP

%+i%<cop%>: V-PERS-G2-NOSG3 ; 
%+i%<cop%>%<ifi%>:%>d%{Y%} V-PERS-G2 ; 
CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-G1

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{Y%}n CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{Y%}ň CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{Y%}s CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{Y%}ň%{Y%}z CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r CLIT ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-G2-NOSG3

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}m CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}ň CLIT ; ! FIXME: This is ambiguous with (not working) genitives
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}k CLIT ;
!%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}m%{Y%}z CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}ň%{Y%}z CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r CLIT ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-G2

%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLIT ; 
V-PERS-G2-NOSG3 ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-G3

%<p2%>%<sg%>:  # ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{Y%}ň # ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-G4

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>mok CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ňok CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>nok CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>mzok CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>ňzok CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>noklar CLIT ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-G5

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>n CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ň CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>r CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>s CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>ň%{Y%}z CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>rl%{A%}r CLIT ; 

LEXICON DAGI-1

%<attr%>: # ;
%<subst%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON DAGI-2

%<attr%>: # ;
%<subst%>: POSS ;

LEXICON DAGI-3

%<attr%>: # ;
%<subst%>: CASE-POS ;

LEXICON DAGI-4

%<attr%>: # ;
%<subst%>: CLIT-COP ;


LEXICON CASE

 CLIT-COP ; ! Nominative
%<gen%>:%>%{n%}%{U%}ň CLIT-COP ;
%<dat%>:%>%{A%} CLIT-COP ;
!%<acc%>:%>%{n%}%{Y%} CLIT-COP ; ! FIXME: Bad interaction of <acc> + i<cop><p2><sg> = <gen>
%<acc%>:%>%{n%}%{Y%} CLIT ;
%<loc%>:%>d%{A%} CLIT-COP ;
%<abl%>:%>d%{A%}n CLIT-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>d%{Ä%}k%{Y%} DAGI-4 ; 

LEXICON CASE-POS 

 CLIT-COP ; ! Nominative
%<gen%>:%>%{n%}%{Y%}ň CLIT-COP ;
%<dat%>:%>%{n%}%{A%} CLIT-COP ;
!%<acc%>:%>%{n%}%{Y%} CLIT-COP ; ! FIXME: Bad interaction of <acc> + i<cop><p2><sg> = <gen>
%<acc%>:%>%{n%}%{Y%} CLIT ;
%<loc%>:%>%{n%}d%{A%} CLIT-COP ;
%<abl%>:%>%{n%}d%{A%}n CLIT-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>%{n%}d%{Ä%}k%{Y%} DAGI-4 ; 

LEXICON POSS-DAGI 

%<loc%>:%>%{n%}d%{Ä%}k%{Y%} DAGI-3 ; 
CASE-POS ;

LEXICON POSS

%<px1sg%>:%>%{y%}m POSS-DAGI ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{y%}ň POSS-DAGI ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{U%} POSS-DAGI ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{y%}m%{Y%}z POSS-DAGI ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{y%}ň%{Y%}z POSS-DAGI ;
CASE ; 

LEXICON SUBST

%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r POSS ; 
%<pl%>%<loc%>:%>l%{A%}r%>d%{Ä%}k%{Y%} DAGI-2 ; 
POSS ; 


LEXICON N1

%<n%>: SUBST ;
%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>%<abe%>:%>s%{U%}z # ;
%<n%>%<loc%>:%>d%{Ä%}k%{Y%} DAGI-1 ;

LEXICON N2

%<n%>%<pl%>: POSS ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<abe%>:%>s%{U%}z # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:%>d%{Ä%}k%{Y%} DAGI-2 ;



LEXICON NP-COG-OV

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: SUBST ;
a%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:a SUBST ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>: SUBST ;


LEXICON A1

%<adj%>: CLIT-COP ;
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>r%{Ä%}k CLIT-COP ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<adj%>%<advl%>: CLIT-COP ;

LEXICON A3-A

%<adj%>: CLIT-COP ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
ça:%>ç%{A%} ADV ; 
ça%<n%>%<attr%>:%>ç%{A%} # ; 
ça%<n%>:%>ç%{A%} SUBST ; 

LEXICON A3-E

%<adj%>: CLIT-COP ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
çe:%>ç%{A%} ADV ; 
çe%<n%>%<attr%>:%>ç%{A%} # ; 
çe%<n%>:%>ç%{A%} SUBST ; 

LEXICON A2

%<adj%>: CLIT-COP ;

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{y%}nj%{Y%} # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%>%{y%}nj%{Y%} SUBST ;

LEXICON QST

%<qst%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV-ITG

%<adv%>%<itg%>: # ;


LEXICON POSTADV

%<postadv%>: # ;


LEXICON POST

%<post%>: # ;

LEXICON MOD

%<mod%>: # ;

LEXICON MOD-EKEN

%<mod%>: V-PERS-G1 ;
%<mod%>: V-PERS-G2-NOSG3 ; ! Dir/LR
%<mod%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>i # ; ! "Dir/LR

LEXICON PRON-MEN !  FIXME: Complete this paradigm

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:men CLIT ; ! FIXME: standard is to have <nom>
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:meniň CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:maňa CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:meni CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:mende CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:menden CLIT ; 

LEXICON PRON-SEN !  FIXME: Complete this paradigm

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:sen CLIT ; ! FIXME: standard is to have <nom>
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:seniň CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:saňa CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:seni CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:sende CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:senden CLIT ; 

LEXICON PRON-OL ! FIXME: Complete this paradigm

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:ol CLIT ; ! FIXME: standard is to have <nom>
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:onyň CLIT ; ! FIXME: "onyň" or "onuň" ? ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:onuň CLIT ; ! FIXME: "onyň" or "onuň" ?
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:oňa CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ony CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:onda CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ondan CLIT ; 

LEXICON Nouns
gadymy:gadymy N1 ; ! "antiquity" 
garamyk:garamyk N1 ; ! "chickenpox"
mukdar:mukdar N1 ; ! "quantity, amount, number"
ene%-atalar:ene-%atalar N2 ; ! "parents"
arhitektura:arhitektura N1 ; ! "architectural, architecture"
damar:damar N1 ; ! "artery, vessel"
eşek:eşek N1 ; ! "donkey"
grafa:grafa N1 ; ! "graphic"
içege:içege N1 ; ! "intestine, intestine"
krahmal:krahmal N1 ; ! "amylum"
miras:miras N1 ; ! "legacy, legacy"
pilot:pilot N1 ; ! "pilot"
seçek:seçek N1 ; ! "fringe"
tiken:tiken N1 ; ! "spine"
äpişge:äpişge N1 ; ! "window"
ýeňiş:ýeňiş N1 ; ! "victory"
LEXICON ProperNouns
Ahmet:Ahmed NP-ANT-M ; ! "Ahmet"
Mehmet:Mehmet NP-ANT-M ; ! "Mehmet"
Abu:Abu NP-ANT-M ; ! "Abu"
Muhammet:Muhammed NP-ANT-M ; ! "Muhammet"
Aleksandr:Aleksandr NP-ANT-M ; ! "Aleksandr"
Isgender:Isgender NP-ANT-M ; ! "Isgender"
Wasiliý:Wasiliý NP-ANT-M ; ! "Wasiliý"
Ýuriý:Ýuriý NP-ANT-M ; ! "Ýuriý"
Gurbannazar:Gurbannazar NP-ANT-M ; ! "Gurbannazar"
Saparmyrat:Saparmyrat NP-ANT-M ; ! "Saparmyrat"
Muhammetnazar:Muhammetnazar NP-ANT-M ; ! "Muhammetnazar"
Gurbanguly:Gurbanguly NP-ANT-M ; ! "Gurbanguly"
Wiktor:Wiktor NP-ANT-M ; ! "Wiktor"
Isa:Isa NP-ANT-M ; ! "Jesus"
Ana:Ana NP-ANT-F ; ! "Ana"
Anna:Anna NP-ANT-F ; ! "Ana"
Güljahan:Güljahan NP-ANT-F ; ! "Güljahan"
Ogulgerek:Ogulgereg NP-ANT-F ; ! "Ogulgerek"
Dostoýewskiý:Dostoýewskiý NP-COG-MF ; ! "Dostoevsky"
Tolstoý:Tolstoý NP-COG-MF ; ! "Tolstoy"
Muhammedow:Muhammedow NP-COG-OV ; ! "Muhammedow"
Kerbabaýew:Kerbabaýew NP-COG-OV ; ! "Kerbabaýew"
Kösäýew:Kösäýew NP-COG-OV ; ! "Kösäýew"
Ezizow:Ezizow NP-COG-OV ; ! "Ezizow"
Şabanow:Şabanow NP-COG-OV ; ! "Şabanow"
Rebinow:Rebinow NP-COG-OV ; ! "Rebinow"
Nyýazow:Nyýazow NP-COG-OV ; ! "Nyýazow"
Gapurow:Gapurow NP-COG-OV ; ! "Gapurow"
Berdimuhamedow:Berdimuhamedow NP-COG-OV ; ! "Berdimuhamedow"
Hindistan:Hindistan NP-TOP ; ! ""
Gyrgyzystan:Gyrgyzystan NP-TOP ; ! ""
Türkiýe:Türkiýe NP-TOP ; ! "" ! FIXME: Türkiýäniň
Ukraina:Ukraýina NP-TOP ; ! "Ukraine" ! Dir/LR
Russiýa:Russiýa NP-TOP ; ! ""
Bolgariýa:Bolgariýa NP-TOP ; ! ""
Awstraliýa:Awstraliýa NP-TOP ; ! ""
Braziliýa:Braziliýa NP-TOP ; ! ""
Siriýa:Siriýa NP-TOP ; ! ""
Gresiýa:Gresiýa NP-TOP ; ! ""
Iordaniýa:Iordaniýa NP-TOP ; ! ""
Bawariýa:Bawariýa NP-TOP ; ! ""
Koreýa:Koreýa NP-TOP ; ! ! ""
Türkmenabat:Türkmenabad NP-TOP ; ! ""
London:London NP-TOP ; ! "London"
Microsoft:Microsoft NP-AL ; ! "Microsoft"
Wikipedia:Wikipedia NP-AL ; ! "Wikipedia"
Azatlyk:Azatlyk NP-AL ; ! "Azatlyk"
LEXICON Adjectives
ýok:ýok A2 ; ! "" 
bar:bar A2 ; ! ""
däl:däl A2 ; ! ""
zerur:zerur A1 ; ! "necessary"
adatça:adatça A1 ; ! "normal, ok"
esli:esli A1 ; ! "considerable, large"
mämişi:mämişi A1 ; ! "orange"
aýlawly:aýlawly A1 ; ! "round"
boş:boş A1 ; ! "empty"
dözümli:dözümli A1 ; ! "durable"
gamsyz:gamsyz A1 ; ! "carefree"
gyssanmaç:gyssanmaç A1 ; ! "suddenly"
hyrsyz:hyrsyz A1 ; ! "hater"
kelesaň:kelesaň A1 ; ! "clumsy"
meýletin:meýletin A1 ; ! "volunteer"
röwşen:röwşen A1 ; ! "fluorescent"
tüýlek:tüýlek A1 ; ! "hairy"
ýakymly:ýakymly A1 ; ! "nice"
türk:türk A3-E ; ! "Turkish"
horwat:horwat A3-A ; ! "Croatian"
polýak:polýak A3-A ; ! "Polish"
türkmen:türkmen A3-E ; ! "Turkmen"
rus:rus A3-A ; ! "Russian"
pars:pars A3-A ; ! "Persian"
iňlis:iňlis A3-E ; ! "English"
gazak:gazak A3-A ; ! "Kazakh"
arap:arap A3-A ; ! "Arabic"
nemes:nemes A3-E ; ! "German"
fransuz:fransuz A3-A ; ! "French"
italýan:italýan A3-A ; ! "Italian"
grek:grek A3-E ; ! "Greek"
urdu:urdu A3-A ; ! "Urdu"
serb:serb%{Ø%} A3-E ; ! "Serbian"
LEXICON Adverbs
näme% üçin:näme% üçin ADV-ITG ; ! "why?" 
nähili:nähili ADV-ITG ;  ! "how? what kind? what sort?"
näçe:näçe ADV-ITG ;  ! "how much?"
has:has ADV ; ! "very"
beýle:beýle ADV ; ! "such"
soň:soň ADV ; ! "after"
ünslije:ünslije ADV ; ! ""
ýene:ýene ADV ; ! ""
soňra:soňra ADV ; ! "later"
esasan:esasan ADV ; ! "basically"
bäri:bäri ADV ; ! "here"
heniz:heniz ADV ; ! "until now"
asla:asla ADV ; ! "never"
düýbünden:düýbünden ADV ; ! "completely"
hakykatdan:hakykatdan ADV ; ! "really"
mälim:mälim ADV ; ! "clearly"
okgunly:okgunly ADV ; ! "swiftly"
walla:walla ADV ; ! "honestly"
eýýäm:eýýäm ADV ; ! "already, era"
